Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.080

Assistance for program applicants.

The secretary of state shall designate state and local agencies and nonprofit agencies that provide counseling and shelter services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, trafficking, or stalking to assist persons applying to be program participants. Any assistance and counseling rendered by the office of the secretary of state or its designees to applicants shall in no way be construed as legal advice.

[ 2008 c 312 s 4; 2001 c 28 s 3; 1998 c 138 s 4; 1991 c 23 s 8.]